New York, session 2025-2026, A8749.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subdivision 4 of section 277 of 2 the town law, as added by chapter 727 of the laws of 1992, are amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (a) Before the planning board may approve a subdivision plat contain- 5 ing residential units and subdivision plats seeking to divide land 6 exceeding twenty-five acres for commercial and industrial development, 7 such subdivision plat shall also show, when required by such board, a 8 park or parks suitably located for playground or other recreational 9 purposes. 10 (c) In the event the planning board makes a finding pursuant to para- 11 graph (b) of this subdivision that the proposed subdivision plat 12 presents a proper case for requiring a park or parks suitably located 13 for playgrounds or other recreational purposes, then such land shall be 14 set aside and declared held in the public trust for use limited to park, 15 playground, or recreation, together with a sum of money equal to twenty 16 percent of the value of the land or twenty percent of the town's 17 projected costs to improve the property for park, playground or recre- 18 ational purposes whichever is greater but not to exceed thirty percent 19 of the value of the land, to be deposited in a trust fund for improve- 20 ment, expansion, repair or replacement of the park, playground, and 21 recreational facilities and equipment, including costs related to design EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13000-03-6 A. 8749--A 2 1 and construction, and costs related to management and general mainte- 2 nance of the park, playground, and recreational facility created on the 3 land(s) set aside for such purpose. 4 (d) In the event the planning board makes a finding pursuant to para- 5 graph (b) of this subdivision that the proposed subdivision plat 6 presents a proper case for requiring a park or parks suitably located 7 for playgrounds or other recreational purposes, but that a suitable park 8 or parks of adequate size to meet the requirement cannot be properly 9 located on such subdivision plat, the planning board may require a sum 10 of money in lieu thereof, in an amount to be established by the town 11 board. In making such determination of suitability, the board shall 12 assess the size and suitability of lands shown on the subdivision plat 13 which could be possible locations for park or recreational facilities, 14 as well as practical factors including whether there is a need for addi- 15 tional facilities in the immediate neighborhood or existing parks, play- 16 grounds and recreational facilities proximate to the proposed subdivi- 17 sion that would benefit from improvement, expansion, repair, replacement 18 and management and/or general maintenance. Any monies required by the 19 planning board in lieu of land for park, playground or other recreation- 20 al purposes, pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall be depos- 21 ited into a trust fund to be used by the town exclusively for park, 22 playground or other recreational purposes, including the acquisition of 23 property, improvement, expansion, repair or replacement of the park, 24 playground, and recreational facilities and equipment, including costs 25 related to design and construction, and costs related to management and 26 general maintenance of the park, playground, and recreational 27 facilities. 28 § 2. The subdivision heading and paragraphs (c) and (d) of subdivision 29 6 of section 274-a of the town law, as added by chapter 694 of the laws 30 of 1992, are amended to read as follows: 31 Reservation of parkland on site plans containing residential units and 32 commercial and industrial site plans seeking to develop and improve land 33 exceeding twenty-five acres. 34 (c) In the event the authorized board makes a finding pursuant to 35 paragraph (b) of this subdivision that the proposed site plan presents a 36 proper case for requiring a park or parks suitably located for play- 37 grounds or other recreational purposes, then such land shall be set 38 aside and declared held in the public trust for use limited to park, 39 playground, or recreation, together with a sum of money equal to twenty 40 percent of the value of the land or twenty percent of the town's 41 projected costs to improve the property for park, playground or recre- 42 ational purposes whichever is greater but not to exceed thirty percent 43 of the value of the land, to be deposited in a trust fund for improve- 44 ment of the park, playground, and recreational facilities and equipment, 45 including costs related to design and construction, and costs related to 46 management and general maintenance of the park, playground, and recre- 47 ational facility created on the land(s) set aside for such purpose. 48 (d) In the event the planning board makes a finding pursuant to para- 49 graph (b) of this subdivision that the proposed site plan presents a 50 proper case for requiring a park or parks suitably located for play- 51 grounds or other recreational purposes, but that a suitable park or 52 parks of adequate size to meet the requirement cannot be properly 53 located on such site plan, the [authorized] planning board may require a 54 sum of money in lieu thereof to be established by the town board. In 55 making such determination of suitability, the board shall assess the 56 size and suitability of lands shown on the site plan which could be A. 8749--A 3 1 possible locations for park or recreational facilities, as well as prac- 2 tical factors including whether there is a need for additional facili- 3 ties in the immediate neighborhood or existing parks, playgrounds, and 4 recreational facilities proximate to the proposed subdivision that would 5 benefit from improvement, expansion, repair, replacement and management 6 and/or general maintenance. Any monies required by the [authorized] 7 planning board in lieu of land for park, playground or other recreation- 8 al purposes, pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall be depos- 9 ited into a trust fund to be used by the town exclusively for park, 10 playground or other recreational purposes, including the acquisition of 11 property, improvement, expansion, repair or replacement of the park, 12 playground, and recreational facilities and equipment, costs related to 13 design and construction, and costs related to management and general 14 maintenance of the park, playground, and recreational facilities. 15 [(d)] (e) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subdivi- 16 sion, if the land included in a site plan under review is a portion of a 17 subdivision plat which has been reviewed and approved pursuant to 18 section two hundred seventy-six of this article, the authorized board 19 shall credit the applicant for any land set aside or money donated in 20 lieu thereof under such subdivision plat approval. In the event of 21 resubdivision of such plat, nothing shall preclude the additional reser- 22 vation of parkland or money donated in lieu thereof. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.